Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1081.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 278. If bonds or notes are issued and sold by the drain commissioner, installments of the drain taxes shall must bear interest at a rate that is not greater than 1% per annum more than the average rate of interest on the bonds or notes from the date of the preparation of the assessment roll until due. not to exceed the rate of interest payable on the bonds or notes. The bonds or notes may provide, if the drain commissioner so determines, for the payment of interest semiannually. The installments and the interest shall, must, as collected, be paid into the county treasury, and placed to the credit of credited to the fund of the drain, to be and used solely only for the payment of bonds or notes as they the bonds and notes mature or are subject to mandatory redemption. Money collected in anticipation of the payment of the bonds or notes shall must be deposited by the county treasurer in a bank or banks to be designated by the board of commissioners of the county and the interest received shall must belong to the fund. Bonds or notes issued and sold by the drain commissioner shall must bear interest at a rate not to exceed the rate specified in the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2101 to 141.2821.